District of Columbia statutes.
50-508

Rules and regulations.

The Mayor shall issue, and may amend from time to time, rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this chapter.

Mar. 14, 1985, D.C. Law 5-162, § 10, 32 DCR 160
1981 Ed., § 40-1308.
Delegation of authority under D.C. Law 5-162, see Mayor’s Order 85-181, November 5, 1985.